Utah statutes.
76-10-915.   Exempt activities.
(1)  This act may not be construed to prohibit:
(a)  the activities of any public utility to the extent that those activities
are subject to regulation by the public service commission, the state or
federal department of transportation, the federal energy regulatory
commission, the federal communications commission, the interstate commerce
commission, or successor agencies;
(b)  the activities of any insurer, insurance producer, independent insurance
adjuster, or rating organization including, but not limited to, making or
participating in joint underwriting or reinsurance arrangements, to the extent
that those activities are subject to regulation by the commissioner of
insurance;
(c)  the activities of securities dealers, issuers, or agents, to the extent
that those activities are subject to regulation under the laws of either this
state or the United States;
(d)  the activities of any state or national banking institution, to the
extent that the activities are regulated or supervised by state government
officers or agencies under the banking laws of this state or by federal
government officers or agencies under the banking laws of the United States;
(e)  the activities of any state or federal savings and loan association to
the extent that those activities are regulated or supervised by state
government officers or agencies under the banking laws of this state or
federal government officers or agencies under the banking laws of the United
States;
(f)  the activities of a municipality to the extent authorized or directed by
state law; or
(g)  the activities of an emergency medical service provider licensed under
Title 26, Chapter 8a, Utah Emergency Medical Services System Act, to the
extent that those activities are regulated by state government officers or
agencies under that act.
(2) (a)  The labor of a human being is not a commodity or article of commerce.
(b)  Nothing contained in the antitrust laws shall be construed to forbid the
existence and operation of labor, agricultural, or horticultural
organizations, instituted for the purpose of mutual help and not having
capital stock or conducted for profit, or to forbid or restrain individual
members of these organizations from lawfully carrying out their legitimate
objects; nor may these organizations or membership in them be held to be
illegal combinations or conspiracies in restraint of trade under the antitrust
laws.
(3) (a)  As used in this section, an entity is also a municipality if the
entity was formed under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act,
prior to January 1, 1981, and the entity is:
(i)  a project entity as defined in Section 11-13-103;
(ii)  an electric interlocal entity as defined in Section 11-13-103; or
(iii)  an energy services interlocal entity as defined in Section 11-13-103.
(b)  The activities of the entities under Subsection (3)(a) are authorized or
directed by state law.
